Hawaii statutes.
[§551G-15] Exclusive and continuing
jurisdiction. Except as otherwise provided in section 551G-14, a court
that has appointed a guardian or issued a protective order consistent with this
chapter has exclusive and continuing jurisdiction over the proceeding until it
is terminated by the court or the appointment or order expires by its own
terms. [L 2012, c 236, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next